Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7009
Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, how cited.

Sections 77-7009 to 77-7016 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 1.